Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Registry of Election Finance
121.150.
Campaign contribution restrictions and expenditure limitations.

No contribution shall be made or received, directly or indirectly, other than an independent expenditure, to support inauguration activities or to support or defeat a candidate, slate of candidates, constitutional amendment, or public question which will appear on the ballot in an election, except through the duly appointed campaign manager, or campaign treasurer of the candidate, slate of candidates, or registered committee. Any person making an independent expenditure, shall report these expenditures when the expenditures by that person exceed five hundred dollars ($500) in the aggregate in any one (1) election, on a form provided or using a format approved by the registry and shall sign a statement on the form, under penalty of perjury, that the expenditure was an actual independent expenditure and that there was no prior communication with the campaign on whose behalf it was made.

Except as provided in KRS 121.180(10), the solicitation from and contributions by campaign committees, caucus campaign committees, political issues committees, permanent committees, and party executive committees to any religious, charitable, civic, eleemosynary, or other causes or organizations established primarily for the public good is expressly prohibited; except that it shall not be construed as a violation of this section for a candidate or a slate of candidates to contribute to religious, civic, or charitable groups.

No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone acting on their behalf, shall accept any anonymous contribution in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), and all anonymous contributions in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be returned to the donor, if the donor can be determined. If no donor is found, the contribution shall escheat to the state. No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone acting on their behalf shall accept anonymous contributions in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) in the aggregate in any one (1) election. Anonymous contributions in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) in the aggregate which are received in any one (1) election shall escheat to the state.

No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf, shall accept a cash contribution in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) in the aggregate from each contributor in any one (1) election. No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf, shall accept a cashier’s check or money order in excess of the maximum cash contribution limit unless the instrument clearly identifies both the payor and the payee. A contribution made by cashier’s check or money order which identifies both the payor and payee shall be treated as a contribution made by check for purposes of the contribution limits contained in this section. No person shall make a cash contribution in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election to a candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf.

No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf, shall accept any contribution in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) from any person who shall not become eighteen (18) years of age on or before the day of the next general election.

Except as provided in subsection (22) of this section, no candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, nor anyone acting on their behalf, shall accept a contribution of more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) as indexed for inflation every odd-numbered year using the preceding year’s percent increase in the non-seasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, for that year as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest hundred dollars, from any person, permanent committee, or contributing organization in any one (1) election. No person, permanent committee, or contributing organization shall contribute more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) as indexed for inflation every odd-numbered year using the preceding year’s percent increase in the non-seasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest hundred dollars, to any one (1) candidate, campaign committee, nor anyone acting on their behalf, in any one (1) election.

Permanent committees or contributing organizations affiliated by bylaw structure or by registration, as determined by the Registry of Election Finance, shall be considered as one (1) committee for purposes of applying the contribution limits of subsection (6) of this section.

No permanent committee shall contribute funds to another permanent committee for the purpose of circumventing contribution limits of subsection (6) of this section.

No person shall contribute funds to a permanent committee, political issues committee, or contributing organization for the purpose of circumventing the contribution limits of subsection (6) of this section.

No person shall contribute more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) as indexed for inflation every odd-numbered year using the preceding year’s percent increase in the non-seasonally adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, All Items, for that year as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics and rounded to the nearest hundred dollars, to a permanent committee or contributing organization in any one (1) year.

No person shall contribute more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) to the state executive committee of a political party in any one (1) year. The contribution limit in this paragraph shall not apply to a contribution designated exclusively for a state executive committee’s building fund account established under KRS

121.172

.

No person shall contribute more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) to a subdivision or affiliate of a state political party in any one (1) year.

No person shall contribute more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) to a caucus campaign committee in any one (1) year.

No person shall make a payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money to another person to contribute to a candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, contributing organization, or anyone on their behalf. No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf shall accept a contribution made by one (1) person who has received a payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money from another person to contribute to a candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, contributing organization, or anyone on their behalf.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (17) of this section, no candidate or slate of candidates for nomination to any state, county, city, or district office, nor their campaign committees, nor anyone on their behalf, shall solicit or accept contributions for primary election expenses after the date of the primary. No person other than the candidate or slate of candidates shall contribute for primary election expenses after the date of the primary.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (17) of this section, no candidate or slate of candidates for any state, county, city, or district office at a regular election, nor their campaign committees, nor anyone on their behalf, shall solicit or accept contributions for regular election expenses after the date of the regular election. No person other than the candidate or slate of candidates shall contribute for regular election expenses after the date of the regular election.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (17) of this section, no candidate or slate of candidates for nomination or election to any state, county, city, or district office, nor their campaign committees, nor anyone on their behalf, shall solicit or accept contributions for special election expenses after the date of the special election. No person other than the candidate or slate of candidates shall contribute for special election expenses after the date of the special election.

The provisions of subsections (13) and (14) of this section shall apply only to those candidates in a primary or regular election which shall be conducted subsequent to January 1, 1989. The provisions of subsection (15) of this section shall apply only to those candidates or slates of candidates in a special election which shall be conducted subsequent to January 1, 1993.

A candidate, slate of candidates, or a campaign committee may solicit and accept contributions after the date of a primary election, regular election, or special election to defray necessary expenses that arise after the date of the election associated with election contests, recounts, and recanvasses of a specific election, complaints regarding alleged campaign finance violations that are filed with the registry pertaining to a specific election, or other legal actions pertaining to a specific election to which a candidate, slate of candidates, or campaign committee is a party, and for repayment of debts and obligations owed by the campaign. Reports of contributions received and expenditures made after the date of the specific election shall be made in accordance with KRS

121.180

.

No candidate, slate of candidates, committee, except a political issues committee, or contributing organization, nor anyone on their behalf, shall knowingly accept a contribution from a corporation, directly or indirectly, except to the extent that the contribution is designated to a state executive committee’s building fund account established under KRS

121.172

.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the ability of a corporation to administer its permanent committee insofar as its actions can be deemed not to influence an election as prohibited by KRS

121.025

.

No candidate, slate of candidates, or committee, nor anyone on their behalf, shall solicit a contribution of money or services from a state employee, whether or not the employee is covered by the classified service provisions of KRS Chapter 18A. However, it shall not be a violation of this subsection for a state employee to receive a solicitation directed to him as a registered voter in an identified precinct as part of an overall plan to contact voters not identified as state employees.

No candidate or slate of candidates for any office in this state shall accept a contribution, including an in-kind contribution, which is made from funds in a federal campaign account. No person shall make a contribution, including an in-kind contribution, from funds in a federal campaign account to any candidate or slate of candidates for any office in this state.

It shall be permissible for a married couple to make a contribution with one (1) check that reflects the combined individual contribution limits of each individual spouse per election, as set forth in subsection (6) of this section, for all elections in a calendar year and the following shall be required to be written on the check:

The signatures of both spouses on the signature line of the check; and

The designation of each contribution amount and the election or elections to which they apply shall be memorialized on the memo line of the check.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 187; 1980, ch. 292, § 6, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 100, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 168, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 15, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 55, § 1, effective March 11, 1988; 1988, ch. 118, § 2, effective 1991; 1988, ch. 341, § 43, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 314, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 476, Pt. II, § 73, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 288, § 25, effective July 14, 1992*; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 57, effective September 16, 1993; 1994, ch. 458, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 153, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 188, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 372, § 1, effective April 12, 1996; 1998, ch. 599, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 398, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 105, § 5, effective March 16, 2005; 2008, ch. 129, § 11, effective July 15, 2008; 2011, ch. 51, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 122, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

121.160.
Campaign treasurers — Duties.

Each candidate or slate of candidates shall, on a form prescribed and furnished by the registry, designate a campaign treasurer to act as their agent at the time they file as a candidate or slate of candidates, and until this requirement is met, the candidate or slate of candidates shall be listed as their own treasurer and accountable as such. The candidate or slate of candidates may appoint themselves or any registered voter in Kentucky as the campaign treasurer. The office with which the candidate or slate of candidates is required to file shall immediately forward to the registry a copy of the candidate’s or slate’s filing papers. The office with which the candidate or slate of candidates files shall promptly notify the registry when a candidate withdraws.

The duties of a campaign treasurer shall be to:

Designate a depository bank in which the primary campaign account shall be maintained and deposit all contributions in that account;

Keep detailed and exact accounts of:

Contributions of any amount made by a permanent committee, by name and business address of the permanent committee, the date of the contribution, the amount contributed, and a description of the major business, social, or political interest represented by the permanent committee; and

Contributions in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) made to any candidate, by name, address, age if under legal voting age, date of the contribution, amount of the contribution, and the employer and occupation of each other contributor. If the contributor is self-employed, the name under which he is doing business shall be listed. The occupation listed for the contributor shall be specific. A general classification, such as “businessman,” shall be insufficient;

Make or authorize all expenditures on behalf of a candidate or slate of candidates. Any expenditure in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25) shall be by check and the treasurer’s records shall disclose the name, address, and occupation of every person or firm to whom made, and shall list the date and amount of the expenditure and the treasurer shall keep a receipted bill for each;

Maintain all receipted bills and accounts required by this section for a period of six (6) years from the date he files his last report under KRS 121.180(3)(b)1.; and

Make no payment to any person not directly providing goods or services with the intent to conceal payment to another.

A candidate or slate of candidates may remove a campaign treasurer at any time.

In case of the death, resignation, or removal of a campaign treasurer, the candidate or slate of candidates shall within three (3) days after receiving notice thereof by certified mail, appoint a successor and shall file his name and address with the registry. The candidate, or slate shall be accountable as their own campaign treasurer if they fail to meet this filing requirement.

A person may serve as campaign treasurer for more than one (1) candidate or slate of candidates, but all reports shall be made separately for each individual candidate or slate.

The candidate or slate of candidates may pay a campaign treasurer a salary for his services which shall be considered a campaign expense and shall comply with the reporting provisions of KRS

121.180

and administrative regulations promulgated by the registry.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 188; 1976, ch. 6, § 1; 1980, ch. 114, § 17, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 111, § 69, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 100, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, § 44, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 288, § 26, effective July 14, 1992; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 58, effective November 3, 1993; 1994, ch. 458, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 2022 ch. 208, § 2, effective April 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 219, § 7, effective July 14, 2022.

121.170.
Registration of committees and fundraisers — Information required — Permanent committee by member of General Assembly prohibited — Official contact person.

Any committee, except a federally registered out-of-state permanent committee, organized under any provisions of this chapter shall register with the registry, by filing official notice of intention at the time of organization, giving names, addresses, and positions of the officers of the organization, identifying an official contact person of the committee, and designating the candidate or candidates, slate of candidates, or question it is organized to support or oppose on forms prescribed by the registry; except that no campaign committee for a slate of candidates for Governor and Lieutenant Governor shall be registered prior to the filing of a certificate or petition of nomination for the candidate for Governor under KRS

118.365

. No entity which is excluded from the definition of “campaign committee” established in KRS 121.015(3)(a) shall be required to register as a committee with the registry. The name of the committee shall reasonably identify to the public the sponsorship and purpose of the committee. The forms filed with the registry shall require the registrant to clearly identify the specific purpose, sponsorship, and source from which the committee originates; and the registry shall refuse to allow filing by any committee until this requirement has been satisfied.

Any person who acts as a fundraiser by directly soliciting contributions for an election campaign of a candidate or slate of candidates for statewide-elected state office or an office in a jurisdiction containing in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000) residents shall register with the registry when he or she raises in excess of three thousand dollars ($3,000) in any one (1) election for the campaign committee by filing official notice giving his or her name, address, occupation, employer or, if he or she is self-employed, the name under which he or she is doing business, and all candidates or slates of candidates for whom he or she is soliciting on forms prescribed by the registry. A registered fundraiser shall comply with the campaign finance reporting requirements of KRS 121.180(3), (4), and (5).

All provisions of KRS

121.160

governing the duties and responsibilities of a candidate, slate of candidates, or campaign treasurer shall apply to a registered committee, except a federally registered out-of-state permanent committee, and a person acting as a campaign fundraiser. In case of the death, resignation, or removal of a campaign treasurer for a permanent committee or executive committee, the chairperson of the permanent committee or executive committee shall, within three (3) days after receiving notice of the vacancy by certified mail, appoint a successor as treasurer for the committee and file the name and address of the successor with the registry. The chairperson of the permanent committee or executive committee shall be accountable as the treasurer for the committee if the chairperson fails to meet this filing requirement.

The chairperson of a committee and the campaign treasurer shall be separate persons.

Any federally registered out-of-state permanent committee that contributes to a Kentucky candidate or a slate of candidates shall:

File with the registry a copy of its federal registration (Federal Election Commission Form 1 - Committee Registration Form);

File with the registry a copy of the Federal Election Commission finance report when a contribution is made to a Kentucky candidate or a slate of candidates; and

Contribute not more than the maximum amount permitted for a permanent committee to make under Kentucky law to any candidate or to any slate of candidates for any office in this Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a contribution made by a federally registered permanent committee to any candidate or to any slate of candidates for any office in this Commonwealth that complies with the provisions of 2

U.S.C. sec. 441

b, 11 C.F.R. sec. 104.10, 11 C.F.R. sec. 106.6, and 11 C.F.R. sec. 114.1-114.12 regarding limitations on contributions by corporations shall be deemed to comply with the campaign finance laws of this Commonwealth prohibiting corporate contributions to candidates or slates of candidates.

The organization, formation, or registration of a permanent committee by any member of the General Assembly shall be prohibited.

The official contact person of a permanent committee shall not be a legislative agent as defined in KRS

6.611

or an executive agency lobbyist as defined in KRS

11A.201

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 189; 1980, ch. 292, § 7, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 100, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, § 45, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 288, § 27, effective July 14, 1992; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 59, effective January 1, 1994; 1994, ch. 458, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 153, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 179, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 599, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 105, § 6, effective March 16, 2005; 2011, ch. 51, § 2, effective June 8, 2011; 2020 ch. 88, § 11, effective July 15, 2020.

121.172.
State political party building fund account — Permitted and prohibited expenditures — Exclusive designation of contributions — Information provided to potential contributors — Separate bank account required — Reports of contributions and expenditures.

A state executive committee of a political party may establish a building fund account. The registry shall promulgate administrative regulations, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, necessary to implement this section.

A building fund account established under this section may be used for expenditures related to the purchase, construction, maintenance, renovation, and repair of the state executive committee’s main headquarters facility. Permissible expenditures from a building fund account shall be limited to payments for or purchases of:

Land;

Leases and property taxes;

Appliances and fixtures;

Utilities, pest control, lawn care, security, and trash removal;

Equipment for Internet, telephone, cable or satellite television, or other communications services;

Building construction, expansion, or renovation;

Major and minor repairs to the state executive committee’s main headquarters facility, including but not limited to the facility’s roof, foundation, and structure, and to the facility’s plumbing, HVAC, and electrical systems; and

The services of contractors, subcontractors, and other building design or construction professionals related to the state executive committee’s main headquarters facility.

A building fund account established under this section shall not be used to advocate for or against the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or a ballot measure or for issue advocacy.

Prohibited expenditures from a building fund account include:

Money or in-kind contributions to a federal, state, or local candidate or slate of candidates;

Money or in-kind contributions to a state or local committee; and

Money or in-kind contributions to advocate for or against the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or a ballot measure or for issue advocacy.

Contributions solicited and accepted by a state executive committee for a building fund account established under this section shall be designated as being exclusively for the state executive committee’s building fund account.

The state executive committee shall advise all potential contributors to a building fund account established under this section that funds contributed will be used exclusively for the building fund account and will not be used to advocate for or against the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or a ballot measure or for issue advocacy.

For any building fund account established under this section, a state executive committee shall establish a separate bank account into which all contributions shall be deposited, and no other contributions shall be commingled with building fund account contributions.

A state executive committee shall report all contributions to and expenditures from a building fund account to the Registry of Election Finance on a quarterly basis, as required by KRS

121.180

.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 122, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

121.175.
Allowable campaign expenditures — Administrative regulations — Penalties.

No candidate, committee, or contributing organization shall permit funds in a campaign account to be expended for any purpose other than for allowable campaign expenditures. “Allowable campaign expenditures” means expenditures including reimbursement for actual expenses, made directly and primarily in support of or opposition to a candidate, constitutional amendment, or public question which will appear on the ballot and includes, but is not limited to, expenditures for staff salaries, gifts and meals for volunteer campaign workers, food and beverages provided at a campaign rally, advertising, office space, necessary travel if reported, campaign paraphernalia, purchases of advertisements in athletic and scholastic publications, communications with constituents or prospective voters, polling and consulting, printing, graphic arts, or advertising services, postage, office supplies, stationery, newsletters, and equipment which is used primarily for the administration of the campaign. “Allowable campaign expenditures” does not include necessary travel unless reported, expenditures of funds in a campaign account for any purpose made unlawful by other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes or which would bestow a private pecuniary benefit, except for payment of the reasonable value of goods and services provided upon a candidate, member of the candidate’s family, committee, or contributing organization, or any of their employees, paid or unpaid, including: tickets to an event which is unrelated to a political campaign or candidacy; items of personal property for distribution to prospective voters except items bearing the name, likeness, or logo of a candidate or a campaign-related communication; expenditures to promote or oppose a candidacy for a leadership position in a governmental, professional, or political organization, or other entity; and equipment or appliances the primary use of which is for purposes outside of the campaign. The provisions of KRS

121.190

notwithstanding, a candidate shall not be required to include a disclaimer on campaign stationery purchased with funds from his campaign account. A member of the General Assembly may utilize funds in his or her campaign account to contribute up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per year to a political party or caucus campaign committee. A member of the General Assembly may make allowable campaign expenditures in both election years and nonelection years.

By December 31, 1993, the registry shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement and enforce the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

In lieu of the penalties provided in KRS

121.140

and

121.990

for a violation of this section, the registry may, after hearing:

For a violation which was not committed knowingly, order the violator to repay the amount of campaign funds which were expended for other than allowable campaign expenditures, and if not repaid within thirty (30) days, may impose a fine of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for each day the amount is not repaid, up to a maximum fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000); and

For a violation which was committed knowingly, in addition to referring the matter for criminal prosecution, order the violator to repay the amount of campaign funds which were expended for other than allowable campaign expenditures, and if not repaid within thirty (30) days, may impose a fine of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for each day the amount is not repaid, up to a maximum fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 63, effective November 3, 1993; 1994, ch. 458, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 479, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 105, § 7, effective March 16, 2005; 2022 ch. 208, § 5, effective April 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 219, § 12, effective July 14, 2022.